New York, session 2025-2026, S7177.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 2 8-d to read as follows: 3 § 8-d. Report on agency minority and women-owned business development 4 contracts and spending. The comptroller is hereby authorized and 5 directed to publish, and make publicly available on its website, a 6 report on agency minority and women-owned business development contracts 7 and spending. Such report shall be interactive for its users, as an 8 online transparency tool, including an intuitive dashboard approach that 9 combines a series of graphs and user-friendly tables, that provides 10 access to subcontractor and minority and women-owned business enterprise 11 spending and contract information pursuant to this section. Such report 12 shall include the amount of money contracted to each state agency and 13 such amount shall be further broken down into the following four catego- 14 ries: Asian American, Black American, Hispanic American, and women. 15 Such report shall also include the total number of prime contractors and 16 subcontractors used as well as the amount of money spent on each 17 contract or contracts. All reportable data shall be published annually 18 by fiscal and calendar year and shall provide for comparison between 19 years. The website shall feature the current calendar and fiscal year 20 report information and archive all previous calendar and fiscal year 21 reports, beginning with the year two thousand seventeen, which shall be 22 easy for users to access. The website shall be developed and designed 23 to allow users to search various combinations of data requests in a 24 single report, with the ability to disaggregate data. The comptroller 25 shall consult with the comptroller of New York city regarding the devel- 26 opment and design of the website and shall provide comparable report and 27 data organization for its website. 28 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10981-01-5